District of Columbia statutes.
25-372

Nude dancing performances.

Nude dancers in an establishment licensed under § 25-371(b) shall perform only upon a stage at least 18 inches above the immediate floor level and removed at least 3 feet from the nearest customer. The licensee under an on-premises retailer’s license for a multipurpose facility for a legitimate theater may permit nudity by performers in dramatic productions.

History

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959